Missouri, session 2026, HB2593.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 34.074, 40.490, 41.216, 41.220, 41.430, 41.475, 42.300, 42.310,
42.312, 42.315, 105.265, 105.270, and 173.239, RSMo, are repealed and twenty-four new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 34.069, 34.074, 40.490, 41.216,
41.430, 41.475, 41.477, 41.598, 41.599, 41.1015, 41.1016, 41.1017, 41.1018, 41.1030,
42.300, 42.310, 42.311, 42.312, 42.313, 42.315, 42.316, 105.265, 105.270, and 173.239, to
read as follows:
34.069. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Honorably discharged veteran", any individual who is honorably
discharged from any branch of the United States Armed Forces as certified by the
appropriate federal agency responsible for the administration of veterans' affairs;
(2) "Honorably discharged veteran-owned enterprise":
(a) A sole proprietorship owned and controlled by an honorably discharged
veteran;
(b) A partnership or joint venture owned and controlled by honorably
discharged veterans in which at least fifty-one percent of the ownership interest is held
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

SS SCS HB 2593 2
by honorably discharged veterans and the management and daily business operations
are controlled by one or more of the honorably discharged veteran owners; or
(c) A corporation or other entity:
a. At least fifty-one percent of which is owned by one or more honorably
discharged veterans or, if stock is issued, at least fifty-one percent of the stock is owned
by one or more honorably discharged veterans; and
b. Whose management and daily business operations are controlled by one or
more of the honorably discharged veteran owners.
2. In letting contracts for the performance of any job or service, all agencies,
departments, institutions, and other entities of this state and of each political subdivision
of this state shall give a three-point bonus preference to honorably discharged veteran-
owned enterprises that are doing business as Missouri firms, corporations, or
individuals or that maintain Missouri offices or places of business.
3. In implementing the provisions of subsection 2 of this section, the following
provisions shall apply:
(1) The commissioner of administration shall have the goal of three percent of all
state contracts described in subsection 2 of this section to be let to honorably discharged
veteran-owned enterprises;
(2) If an insufficient number of honorably discharged veteran-owned enterprises
submit a bid or proposal for a contract let by an agency, department, institution, or
other entity of the state or of a political subdivision of the state, the provisions of
subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not apply; and
(3) Any honorably discharged veteran-owned enterprise that receives bonus
points under this section shall not receive bonus points under section 34.074.
4. The commissioner of administration may promulgate rules to implement the
provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any
of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
34.074. 1. As used in this section, the term "service-disabled veteran" means any
individual who is disabled as certified by the appropriate federal agency responsible for the
administration of veterans' affairs.

SS SCS HB 2593 3
2. As used in this section, the term "service-disabled veteran business" means a
business concern:
(1) Not less than fifty-one percent of which is owned by one or more service-disabled
veterans or, in the case of any publicly owned business, not less than fifty-one percent of the
stock of which is owned by one or more service-disabled veterans; and
(2) The management and daily business operations of which are controlled by one or
more service-disabled veterans.
3. In letting contracts for the performance of any job or service, all agencies,
departments, institutions, and other entities of this state and of each political subdivision of
this state shall give a three-point bonus preference to service-disabled veteran businesses
doing business as Missouri firms, corporations, or individuals, or which maintain Missouri
offices or places of business.
4. In implementing the provisions of subsection 3 of this section, the following shall
apply:
(1) The commissioner of administration shall have the goal of three percent of all
such contracts described in subsection 3 of this section to be let to such veterans;
(2) If no or an insufficient number of such veterans doing business in this state submit
a bid or proposal for a contract let by an agency, department, institution, or other entity of the
state or a political subdivision, such goal shall not be required and the provisions of
subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not apply; and
(3) Any service-disabled veteran business that receives bonus points under this
section shall not receive bonus points under section 34.069.
5. The commissioner of administration may promulgate rules in order to implement
the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant
of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2010, shall be
invalid and void.
40.490. 1. Members of the state military forces of this state who are ordered to active
state duty by the governor or adjutant general, any Missouri employee who is a member of
the National Guard of another state and who is called into active state duty by the governor or
adjutant generalof that state, or any member of any reserve component of the Armed Forces
of the United States who is called to active duty shall, upon being relieved from such duty, be
entitled to the same reemployment rights provided by Title 38 of the United States Code, the

SS SCS HB 2593 4
Revised Statutes of Missouri, and all amendments thereto. The attorney general shall enforce
the reemployment rights contained in this section for members of the state military forces
who are ordered to active state duty by the governor or adjutant general.
2. Members of the Missouri National Guard who are called to active state duty
by the governor or adjutant general for a period of more than thirty consecutive days
and any Missouri employees who are members of the National Guard of another state
and are called to active state duty by the governor or adjutant general of that state for a
period of more than thirty consecutive days shall, upon being relieved from such duty,
be entitled to all rights and protections provided by the Servicemembers Civil Relief
Act, 50 U.S.C. Section 3901 et seq., and all amendments thereto.
3. Any member of the Missouri National Guard and any Missouri employee who
is a member of the National Guard of another state may bring suit in any court of
competent jurisdiction and appropriate venue if such individual believes that his or her
rights under this section have been violated. The attorney general may also bring suit
against an employer who violates the provisions of this section.
41.216. 1. Subject to appropriation and upon the recommendation of a panel
consisting of a [sergeant major] senior enlisted leader of the Missouri National Guard, a
sergeant major of a reserve component or its equivalent, and a representative of the Missouri
[veterans] veterans' commission [who shall establish criteria for the grants by the
promulgation of rules and regulations], the adjutant general shall have the power to
establish criteria for the grants by the promulgation of rules and regulations, and to
make grants or provide other financial assistance or services from the Missouri military
family relief fund to members of the Missouri National Guard,families of persons who are
members of the Missouri National Guard [or], and to Missouri residents who are members of
the reserves of the Armed Forces of the United States.
2. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028.
This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2005, shall be invalid
and void.
41.430. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as "The Supporting
Missouri Servicemen and Women Act".
2. Officers, warrant officers and enlisted personnel of the organized militia on active
duty in the service of the state shall receive as compensation the same pay, longevity, and

SS SCS HB 2593 5
allowances as are or may be provided for members of like grade and branch of service in the
Armed Forces of the United States[.], except:
(1) Members of the organized militia serving on active duty shall receive as a
minimum the daily rate equivalent to the grade level of E5 with maximum longevity and with
dependents; and
(2) Members of the organized militia serving on active duty in service of the state
for more than thirty days shall receive a monthly allowance for any premiums for
coverage of the member under the TRICARE program of the United States Department
of Defense or under any other government-sponsored insurance program during the
period of active duty.
41.475. 1. The governor is hereby authorized to request volunteers of the organized
militia to assist federal law enforcement authorities within or outside the state, or to assist
federal, state or local law enforcement authorities within this state, and order such volunteers
to duty for the purpose of providing assistance in drug interdiction and counter-drug activities
and operation and maintenance of equipment and facilities for such purposes pursuant to
plans adopted and funding assistance received under the provisions of 32 U.S.C. 112.
2. The governor may delegate the authority conferred by this section to the adjutant
general, but the governor shall retain sole authority to approve any and all plans submitted to
the Secretary of Defense under 32 U.S.C. 112. The adjutant general shall ensure that all
directives and policies of the Department of Defense and National Guard Bureau are
followed. Personnel assisting in such activities shall obey and execute the instructions of the
civil authorities charged by law with responsibility for law enforcement.
3. The adjutant general is hereby authorized to present, in the name of the state
of Missouri, a Missouri National Guard counterdrug program ribbon, which shall be of
suitable design, as may be determined by the adjutant general, to individual members of
the Missouri National Guard who have participated in the counterdrug program. The
period of eligibility shall be from January 1, 1989, to a future date to be determined by
the adjutant general or the cessation of the counterdrug program. No Missouri National
Guard counterdrug program ribbon shall be awarded to or retained by any person
whose entire service shall not have been honorable. If a member qualifies for the
Missouri National Guard counterdrug program ribbon but dies before making a
request or before receipt, then the Missouri National Guard counterdrug program
ribbon may be requested by and presented to the surviving primary next of kin. The
adjutant general shall adopt policies and operating regulations concerning only its
internal management of this Missouri National Guard counterdrug program ribbon,
which need not be published in the Missouri Register or the code of state regulations

SS SCS HB 2593 6
under chapter 536, but these regulations shall be available for public inspection and
review.
41.477. 1. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Missouri National
Guard Counterdrug Revolving Fund", which shall consist of all moneys received by the
Missouri National Guard through federal asset forfeiture programs, including, but not
limited to, the United States Department of Justice Asset Forfeiture Program, the
United States Department of the Treasury Asset Forfeiture Program, and any successor
programs or funds established by the federal government for the distribution of seized
or forfeited assets. The Missouri National Guard counterdrug revolving fund shall be
administered by the adjutant general. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the
Missouri National Guard counterdrug revolving fund. In accordance with sections
30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The Missouri
National Guard counterdrug revolving fund shall be a dedicated fund and moneys in the
fund shall be used by the adjutant general solely for purposes authorized by the federal
programs from which the moneys originated. Moneys in the Missouri National Guard
counterdrug revolving fund shall not be utilized to supplant, decrease, or otherwise
diminish any state appropriations or allocations otherwise provided for the Missouri
National Guard's standard operations, personnel, or infrastructure. Notwithstanding
the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, moneys remaining in the Missouri
National Guard counterdrug revolving fund at the end of any biennium shall not revert
to the credit of the general revenue fund. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
Missouri National Guard counterdrug revolving fund in the same manner as other
funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the Missouri National Guard counterdrug revolving fund.
2. Participation in federal asset forfeiture programs shall be at the discretion of
the adjutant general. Upon electing to participate, the Missouri National Guard shall
comply with the terms of an equitable sharing agreement and certificate of the federal
asset forfeiture program, including, but not limited to, the United States Department of
Justice Asset Forfeiture Program and the United States Department of the Treasury
Asset Forfeiture Program, or any successor agreement or certification required by the
federal government.
41.598. The adjutant general is hereby authorized to present, in the name of the
state of Missouri, a Missouri National Guard homeland response force program ribbon,
which shall be of suitable design, as may be determined by the adjutant general, to
individual members of the Missouri National Guard who have participated in the
homeland response force program. The period of eligibility shall be from January 1,
2012, to a future date to be determined by the adjutant general or the cessation of the

SS SCS HB 2593 7
homeland response force program. No Missouri National Guard homeland response
force program ribbon shall be awarded to or retained by any person whose entire
service shall not have been honorable. If a member qualifies for the Missouri National
Guard homeland response force ribbon but dies before making a request or before
receipt, then the Missouri National Guard homeland response force program ribbon
may be requested by and presented to the surviving primary next of kin. The adjutant
general shall adopt policies and operating regulations concerning only its internal
management of this Missouri National Guard homeland response force program ribbon,
which need not be published in the Missouri Register or the code of state regulations
under chapter 536, but these regulations shall be available for public inspection and
review.
41.599. The adjutant general is hereby authorized to present, in the name of the
state of Missouri, a Missouri National Guard engineer explosive ordnance clearance
agent ribbon, which shall be of suitable design, as may be determined by the adjutant
general, to individual members of the Missouri National Guard who have participated
in an engineer explosive ordnance clearance agent course. The period of eligibility shall
be from January 1, 2012, to a future date to be determined by the adjutant general or
the cessation of the engineer explosive ordnance clearance agent course. No Missouri
National Guard engineer explosive ordnance clearance agent ribbon shall be awarded to
or retained by any person whose entire service shall not have been honorable. If a
member qualifies for the Missouri National Guard engineer explosive ordnance
clearance agent ribbon but dies before making a request or before receipt, then the
Missouri National Guard engineer explosive ordnance clearance agent ribbon may be
requested by and presented to the surviving primary next of kin. The adjutant general
shall adopt policies and operating regulations concerning only its internal management
of this Missouri National Guard engineer explosive ordnance clearance agent ribbon,
which need not be published in the Missouri Register or the code of state regulations
under chapter 536, but these regulations shall be available for public inspection and
review.
41.1015. Sections 41.1015 to 41.1018 shall be known and may be cited as the
"Cybersecurity Mission Act".
41.1016. As used in sections 41.1015 to 41.1018, the following terms mean:
(1) "Critical infrastructure facility", the same meaning as such term is defined
in section 569.086;
(2) "Cyber-attack prevention", proactive measures and strategies implemented
to identify, reduce, and eliminate vulnerabilities in information systems, including, but
not limited to, risk assessments, employee training, system updates, firewalls,

SS SCS HB 2593 8
encryption, and access controls, with the goal of preventing unauthorized access or
malicious activities;
(3) "Cyber-attack response", actions taken during and immediately following a
cybersecurity incident or cyber attack to contain, mitigate, and remediate the effects of
the incident, including, but not limited to, incident reporting, forensic analysis, system
isolation, and communication with affected parties;
(4) "Cyber-attack support", assistance provided to parties or entities affected by
a cybersecurity incident, including, but not limited to, technical aid, recovery of data
and systems, mitigation efforts, and guidance on improving future cybersecurity
measures;
(5) "Cybersecurity", the practice of protecting networks, systems, devices, data,
and information from unauthorized access, disruption, destruction, or theft, through the
implementation of policies, procedures, technologies, and practices designed to ensure
the confidentiality, integrity, reliability, and availability of the networks, systems,
devices, data, and information;
(6) "Governing body", the same meaning as such term is defined in section
67.750;
(7) "Law enforcement agency", the same meaning as such term is defined in
section 590.1040;
(8) "Political subdivision", the same meaning as such term is defined in section
67.750;
(9) "Public college and university", the same meaning as the term "public
colleges and universities" is defined in section 173.355;
(10) "Utility company", the same meaning as such term is defined in section
393.550.
41.1017. 1. Upon the request of the director of the department of public safety
or his or her designee, the Missouri National Guard may enter into agreements with a
party or parties, pertaining to rendering aid related to cybersecurity, cyber-attack
prevention, cyber-attack response, and cyber-attack support activities for this state or
for a political subdivision, governing body, public college and university, law
enforcement agency, utility company, and critical infrastructure facility of this state,
but under no circumstances shall the Missouri National Guard violate the civil liberties
or constitutional rights of any United States citizen or access, modify, scan, control, or
view content contained within any civilian-owned system, device, telephone, computer,
communications, or network without the consent of the owner explicitly and
conspicuously given to the Missouri National Guard.

SS SCS HB 2593 9
2. The adjutant general may activate members of the Missouri National Guard,
on state orders, to carry out the rendering of aid covered under subsection 1 of this
section.
3. The adjutant general may charge and may receive reimbursement for
expenses incurred by the Missouri National Guard, related to rendering aid pursuant to
subsection 1 of this section. The adjutant general shall determine when activating
members of the Missouri National Guard, on state orders, whether expenses related to
rendering aid pursuant to subsection 1 of this section shall be collected through
reimbursement or charge prior to the time the services are rendered. If expenses are
collected by charge prior to the time the services are rendered and the amount of such
expense cannot be readily determined, then the adjutant general shall receive, from the
requesting party, a deposit based upon the likely amount of such expense, and the
balance of such expense shall be payable immediately upon ascertainment of the proper
amount of said expense.
4. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Missouri National Guard
Cybersecurity Revolving Fund", which shall consist of:
(1) Moneys appropriated by the general assembly;
(2) Moneys received as a charge for expenses incurred by the Missouri National
Guard, related to rendering aid pursuant to subsection 1 of this section; and
(3) Moneys received as reimbursement for expenses incurred by the Missouri
National Guard, related to rendering aid pursuant to subsection 1 of this section.

The Missouri National Guard cybersecurity revolving fund shall be administered by the
adjutant general. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the Missouri National Guard
cybersecurity revolving fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state
treasurer may approve disbursements. The Missouri National Guard cybersecurity
revolving fund shall be a dedicated fund and moneys in the fund shall be used solely by
the adjutant general for the purpose of rendering aid pursuant to subsection 1 of this
section. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, moneys
remaining in the Missouri National Guard cybersecurity revolving fund at the end of
any biennium shall not revert to the credit of the general revenue fund. The state
treasurer shall invest moneys in the Missouri National Guard cybersecurity revolving
fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned
on such investments shall be credited to the Missouri National Guard cybersecurity
revolving fund.
41.1018. The adjutant general shall administer the provisions of sections 41.1015
to 41.1018, and may adopt all rules and regulations necessary to administer the

SS SCS HB 2593 10
provisions of sections 41.1015 to 41.1018. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in sections
41.1015 to 41.1018 shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. Sections 41.1015 to
41.1018 and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be
invalid and void.
41.1030. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Department", the Missouri department of the National Guard;
(2) "Living donation period", the time covering all phases of the living donor
process deemed medically necessary for a successful living donation including, but not
limited to, the testing, surgical, and recovery phases;
(3) "Program", the Missouri guaranteed inclusive voluntary exceptional service
(MO GIVES) program established in subsection 2 of this section;
(4) "Qualified member", a member of the department who is in good standing,
who is actively participating in a living organ donation process, who is in a traditional
drilling status (M-Day), and who is not serving on federal active duty orders under Title
10 or Title 32 of the United States Code.
2. The department shall establish a program known as the "Missouri
Guaranteed Inclusive Voluntary Exceptional Service Program" or "MO GIVES".
The program shall, subject to funding, provide state active duty orders for qualified
members during the living donation period. Such orders shall:
(1) Not exceed forty-five days, unless a medical extension is deemed necessary by
the primary surgical team; and
(2) Issue compensation as provided in section 41.430. Such compensation shall
be provided through state active duty orders and shall be in addition to, and not in lieu
thereof, any accrued federal military leave, federal civilian leave, or private employer-
provided annual or medical leave, none of which shall be required to be exhausted to
qualify for the program.
3. Any qualified member may apply to participate in the program.
(1) Applications shall specify the type of donation to be made and whether the
donation is directed to a specific individual, nondirected, or paired. The qualified
member shall agree to undergo the procurement operation only at a transplant center
with status as a member in good standing with the Organ Procurement and Transplant
Network.

SS SCS HB 2593 11
(2) The department may approve an application and issue the corresponding
orders only if the qualified member meets all eligibility requirements set and sufficient
funds are available in the MO GIVES fund created under subsection 4 of this section.
(3) The following individuals are not eligible for participation in the program:
(a) Active Guard Reserve (AGR) personnel serving on full-time federal orders;
(b) Federal technicians under Title 5 and Title 32 of the United States Code; and
(c) Any member who is also a federal employee and whose participation in the
program would result in a violation of federal dual compensation statutes under 5
U.S.C. Section 5533.
4. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "MO GIVES Fund", which
shall consist of moneys appropriated to it by the general assembly and any gifts,
contributions, grants, or bequests received from federal, private, or other sources. The
state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and
30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated
fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used solely to provide
benefits under the program established in this section. Notwithstanding the provisions
of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end of the
biennium shall not revert to the credit of the general revenue fund. The state treasurer
shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
5. The department may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
42.300. 1. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Veterans Commission
Capital Improvement Trust Fund" which shall consist of money collected under section
313.835. The state treasurer shall administer the veterans commission capital improvement
trust fund, and the moneys in such fund shall be used solely, upon appropriation, by the
Missouri [veterans] veterans' commission for:
(1) The construction, maintenance or renovation or equipment needs of veterans'
homes in this state;

SS SCS HB 2593 12
(2) The construction, maintenance, renovation, equipment needs and operation of
veterans' cemeteries in this state;
(3) Fund transfers to Missouri veterans' homes fund established under the provisions
of section 42.121, as necessary to maintain solvency of the fund;
(4) Fund transfers to any municipality with a population greater than four hundred
thousand and located in part of a county with a population greater than six hundred thousand
in this state which has established a fund for the sole purpose of the restoration, renovation
and maintenance of a memorial or museum or both dedicated to World War I. Appropriations
from the veterans commission capital improvement trust fund to such memorial fund shall be
provided only as a one-time match for other funds devoted to the project and shall not exceed
five million dollars. Additional appropriations not to exceed ten million dollars total may be
made from the veterans commission capital improvement trust fund as a match to other funds
for the new construction or renovation of other facilities dedicated as veterans' memorials in
the state. All appropriations for renovation, new construction, reconstruction, and
maintenance of veterans' memorials shall be made only for applications received by the
Missouri [veterans] veterans' commission prior to July 1, 2004;
(5) The issuance of matching fund grants for veterans' service officer programs to any
federally chartered veterans' organization or municipal government agency that is certified by
the Veterans Administration to process veteran claims within the Veterans Administration
System; provided that such veterans' organization has maintained a veterans' service officer
presence within the state of Missouri for the three-year period immediately preceding the
issuance of any such grant. A total of one million five hundred thousand dollars in grants
shall be made available annually for service officers and joint training and outreach between
veterans' service organizations and the Missouri [veterans] veterans' commission with grants
being issued in July of each year. Application for the matching grants shall be made through
and approved by the Missouri [veterans] veterans' commission based on the requirements
established by the commission;
(6) For payment of Missouri National Guard and Missouri [veterans] veterans'
commission expenses associated with providing medals, medallions, and certificates in
recognition of service in the Armed Forces of the United States [during World War II, the
Korean Conflict, and the Vietnam War under sections 42.170 to 42.226] for any conflict,
war, operation, or similar incident identified under chapter 42. Any funds remaining
from the medals, medallions, and certificates shall not be transferred to any other fund and
shall only be utilized for the awarding of future medals, medallions, and certificates in
recognition of service in the Armed Forces;
(7) Fund transfers totaling ten million dollars to any municipality with a population
greater than three hundred fifty thousand inhabitants and located in part in a county with a

SS SCS HB 2593 13
population greater than six hundred thousand inhabitants and with a charter form of
government, for the sole purpose of the construction, restoration, renovation and maintenance
of a memorial or museum or both dedicated to World War I; and
(8) The administration of the Missouri [veterans] veterans' commission.
2. Any interest which accrues to the fund shall remain in the fund and shall be used in
the same manner as moneys which are transferred to the fund under this section.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, moneys in the veterans
commission capital improvement trust fund at the end of any biennium shall not be
transferred to the credit of the general revenue fund.
3. Upon request by the [veterans] Missouri veterans' commission, the general
assembly may appropriate moneys from the veterans commission capital improvement trust
fund to the Missouri National Guard trust fund to support the activities described in section
41.958.
42.310. 1. There is hereby created within the state adjutant general's office the
"Operation Iraqi Freedom and Operation New Dawn Medallion Program". Every veteran
who honorably served on active duty in the United States military service at any time
beginning March 19, 2003, and ending December 15, 2011, shall be entitled to receive an
Operation Iraqi Freedom and Operation New Dawn medallion, medal, and certificate of
appreciation under this section, provided that:
(1) Such veteran is a legal resident of this state or was a legal resident of this state at
the time he or she entered or was discharged from military service or at the time of his or her
death or such veteran served in a unit of the Missouri National Guard regardless of whether
such veteran is or ever was a legal resident of this state; and
(2) Such veteran was honorably separated or discharged from military service, is still
in active service in an honorable status, or was in active service in an honorable status at the
time of his or her death.
2. The Operation Iraqi Freedom and Operation New Dawn medallion, medal, and
certificate shall be awarded regardless of whether such veteran served within the United
States or in a foreign country. The medallion, medal, and certificate shall be awarded
regardless of whether such veteran was under eighteen years of age at the time of enlistment.
3. The following persons may apply for an Operation Iraqi Freedom and
Operation New Dawn medallion, medal, and certificate under this section:
(1) Any veteran who is entitled to an Operation Iraqi Freedom and Operation
New Dawn medallion, medal, and certificate under subsection 1 of this section;
(2) Any spouse or eldest living survivor of a deceased veteran who would be
entitled to an Operation Iraqi Freedom and Operation New Dawn medallion, medal,

SS SCS HB 2593 14
and certificate under subsection 1 of this section but who died prior to having made
application for such medallion, medal, and certificate.
4. If any spouse or eldest living survivor applies for the Operation Iraqi Freedom
and Operation New Dawn medallion, medal, and certificate under this section or if any
veteran dies after applying for an Operation Iraqi Freedom and Operation New Dawn
medallion, medal, and certificate under this section and such veteran would have been
entitled to the Operation Iraqi Freedom and Operation New Dawn medallion, medal,
and certificate, the adjutant general shall give the Operation Iraqi Freedom and
Operation New Dawn medallion, medal, and certificate to the spouse or eldest living
survivor of the deceased veteran.
5. The Missouri veterans' commission shall design the form of the Operation
Iraqi Freedom and Operation New Dawn medallion, medal, and certificate and forward
the approved designs to the adjutant general for distribution pursuant to sections 42.310
to 42.311. It is the intent of the general assembly to create statewide involvement in the
design of these symbols in recognition of this historic endeavor. Therefore, in designing
the forms, the Missouri veterans' commission may solicit potential designs from
elementary and secondary schools, veterans' groups, civic organizations, or any other
interested parties, and may select the best design from among such solicited designs, or
may select another design.
6. For purposes of this section, the term "veteran" means any person defined as a
veteran by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or its successor agency.
42.311. 1. Except as otherwise provided in sections 42.310 to 42.311, the adjutant
general shall administer the provisions of sections 42.310 to 42.311, and may adopt all
rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions of sections 42.310 to 42.311.
Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
under the authority delegated in sections 42.310 to 42.311 shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. Sections 42.310 to 42.311 and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any
of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
2. The adjutant general shall determine as expeditiously as possible the persons
who are entitled to an Operation Iraqi Freedom and Operation New Dawn medallion,
medal, and certificate under sections 42.310 to 42.311 and distribute the medallions,
medals, and certificates as provided in sections 42.310 to 42.311. Applications for the
Operation Iraqi Freedom and Operation New Dawn medallion, medal, and certificate

SS SCS HB 2593 15
shall be filed with the office of the adjutant general at any time after August 28, 2026, on
forms prescribed and furnished by the office of the adjutant general. The adjutant
general shall approve all applications that are in order, and shall cause an Operation
Iraqi Freedom and Operation New Dawn medallion, medal, and certificate to be
prepared for each approved veteran in the form created by the Missouri veterans'
commission under section 42.310. The medallions, medals, and certificates shall be
awarded until the supply of medallions, medals, and certificates is exhausted. The
adjutant general shall notify the general assembly when such supply totals less than one
hundred.
42.312. 1. There is hereby created within the state adjutant general's office the
"Operation Enduring Freedom, Operation Freedom's Sentinel, and Operation Allies Refuge
Program". Every veteran who honorably served on active duty in the United States military
service at any time beginning October 7, 2001, and ending August 30, 2021, shall be entitled
to receive an Operation Enduring Freedom, Operation Freedom's Sentinel, and Operation
Allies Refuge medallion, medal, and certificate of appreciation under this section, provided
that:
(1) Such veteran is a legal resident of this state or was a legal resident of this state at
the time he or she entered or was discharged from military service or at the time of his or her
death, or such veteran served in a unit of the Missouri National Guard regardless of whether
such veteran is or ever was a legal resident of this state; and
(2) Such veteran was honorably separated or discharged from military service, is still
in active service in an honorable status, or was in active service in an honorable status at the
time of his or her death.
2. The Operation Enduring Freedom, Operation Freedom's Sentinel, and Operation
Allies Refuge medallion, medal, and certificate shall be awarded regardless of whether such
veteran served within the United States or in a foreign country. The medallion, medal, and
certificate shall be awarded regardless of whether such veteran was under eighteen years of
age at the time of enlistment.
3. The following persons may apply for an Operation Enduring Freedom,
Operation Freedom's Sentinel, and Operation Allies Refuge Program medallion, medal,
and certificate under this section:
(1) Any veteran who is entitled to an Operation Enduring Freedom, Operation
Freedom's Sentinel, and Operation Allies Refuge Program medallion, medal, and
certificate under subsection 1 of this section;
(2) Any spouse or eldest living survivor of a deceased veteran who would be
entitled to an Operation Enduring Freedom, Operation Freedom's Sentinel, and
Operation Allies Refuge Program medallion, medal, and certificate under subsection 1

SS SCS HB 2593 16
of this section but who died prior to having made application for such medallion, medal,
and certificate.
4. If any spouse or eldest living survivor applies for the Operation Enduring
Freedom, Operation Freedom's Sentinel, and Operation Allies Refuge Program
medallion, medal, and certificate under this section or if any veteran dies after
applying for an Operation Enduring Freedom, Operation Freedom's Sentinel, and
Operation Allies Refuge Program medallion, medal, and certificate under this section
and such veteran would have been entitled to the Operation Enduring Freedom,
Operation Freedom's Sentinel, and Operation Allies Refuge Program medallion, medal,
and certificate, the adjutant general shall give the Operation Enduring Freedom,
Operation Freedom's Sentinel, and Operation Allies Refuge Program medallion, medal,
and certificate to the spouse or eldest living survivor of the deceased veteran.
5. The Missouri veterans' commission shall design the form of the Operation
Enduring Freedom, Operation Freedom's Sentinel, and Operation Allies Refuge
Program medallion, medal, and certificate and forward the approved designs to the
adjutant general for distribution pursuant to sections 42.312 to 42.313. It is the intent of
the general assembly to create statewide involvement in the design of these symbols in
recognition of this historic endeavor. Therefore, in designing the forms, the Missouri
veterans' commission may solicit potential designs from elementary and secondary
schools, veterans' groups, civic organizations, or any other interested parties, and may
select the best design from among such solicited designs, or may select another design.
6. For purposes of this section, the term "veteran" means any person defined as a
veteran by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or its successor agency.
42.313. 1. Except as otherwise provided in sections 42.312 to 42.313, the
adjutant general shall administer the provisions of sections 42.312 to 42.313, and may
adopt all rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions of sections 42.312
to 42.313. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in sections 42.312 to 42.313 shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if
applicable, section 536.028. Sections 42.312 to 42.313 and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
2. The adjutant general shall determine as expeditiously as possible the persons
who are entitled to an Operation Enduring Freedom, Operation Freedom's Sentinel,
and Operation Allies Refuge Program medallion, medal, and certificate under sections

SS SCS HB 2593 17
42.312 to 42.313 and distribute the medallions, medals, and certificates as provided in
sections 42.312 to 42.313. Applications for the Operation Enduring Freedom, Operation
Freedom's Sentinel, and Operation Allies Refuge Program medallion, medal, and
certificate shall be filed with the office of the adjutant general at any time after August
28, 2026, on forms prescribed and furnished by the office of the adjutant general. The
adjutant general shall approve all applications that are in order, and shall cause an
Operation Enduring Freedom, Operation Freedom's Sentinel, and Operation Allies
Refuge Program medallion, medal, and certificate to be prepared for each approved
veteran in the form created by the Missouri veterans' commission under section 42.312.
The medallions, medals, and certificates shall be awarded until the supply of medallions,
medals, and certificates is exhausted. The adjutant general shall notify the general
assembly when such supply totals less than one hundred.
42.315. 1. There is hereby created within the state adjutant general's office the
"Operation Desert Shield and Operation Desert Storm Medallion Program". Every veteran
who honorably served on active duty in the United States military service at any time
beginning August 7, 1990, and ending June 7, 1991, shall be entitled to receive an Operation
Desert Shield and Operation Desert Storm medallion, medal, and certificate of appreciation
under this section, provided that:
(1) Such veteran is a legal resident of this state or was a legal resident of this state at
the time he or she entered or was discharged from military service or at the time of his or her
death or such veteran served in a unit of the Missouri National Guard regardless of whether
such veteran is or ever was a legal resident of this state; and
(2) Such veteran was honorably separated or discharged from military service, is still
in active service in an honorable status, or was in active service in an honorable status at the
time of his or her death.
2. The Operation Desert Shield and Operation Desert Storm medallion, medal, and
certificate shall be awarded regardless of whether such veteran served within the United
States or in a foreign country. The medallion, medal, and the certificate shall be awarded
regardless of whether such veteran was under eighteen years of age at the time of enlistment.
3. The following persons may apply for an Operation Desert Shield and
Operation Desert Storm medallion, medal, and certificate under this section:
(1) Any veteran who is entitled to an Operation Desert Shield and Operation
Desert Storm medallion, medal, and certificate under subsection 1 of this section;
(2) Any spouse or eldest living survivor of a deceased veteran who would be
entitled to an Operation Desert Shield and Operation Desert Storm medallion, medal,
and certificate under subsection 1 of this section but who died prior to having made
application for such medallion, medal, and certificate.

SS SCS HB 2593 18
4. If any spouse or eldest living survivor applies for the Operation Desert Shield
and Operation Desert Storm medallion, medal, and certificate under this section or if
any veteran dies after applying for an Operation Desert Shield and Operation Desert
Storm medallion, medal, and certificate under this section and such veteran would have
been entitled to the Operation Desert Shield and Operation Desert Storm medallion,
medal, and certificate, the adjutant general shall give the Operation Desert Shield and
Operation Desert Storm medallion, medal, and certificate to the spouse or eldest living
survivor of the deceased veteran.
5. The Missouri veterans' commission shall design the form of the Operation
Desert Shield and Operation Desert Storm medallion, medal, and certificate and
forward the approved designs to the adjutant general for distribution pursuant to
sections 42.315 to 42.316. It is the intent of the general assembly to create statewide
involvement in the design of these symbols in recognition of this historic endeavor.
Therefore, in designing the forms, the Missouri veterans' commission may solicit
potential designs from elementary and secondary schools, veterans' groups, civic
organizations, or any other interested parties, and may select the best design from
among such solicited designs, or may select another design.
6. For purposes of this section, the term "veteran" means any person defined as a
veteran by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or its successor agency.
42.316. 1. Except as otherwise provided in sections 42.315 to 42.316, the
adjutant general shall administer the provisions of sections 42.315 to 42.316, and may
adopt all rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions of sections 42.315
to 42.316. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in sections 42.315 to 42.316 shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if
applicable, section 536.028. Sections 42.315 to 42.316 and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
2. The adjutant general shall determine as expeditiously as possible the persons
who are entitled to an Operation Desert Shield and Operation Desert Storm medallion,
medal, and certificate under sections 42.315 to 42.316 and distribute the medallions,
medals, and certificates as provided in sections 42.315 to 42.316. Applications for the
Operation Desert Shield and Operation Desert Storm medallion, medal, and certificate
shall be filed with the office of the adjutant general at any time after August 28, 2026, on
forms prescribed and furnished by the office of the adjutant general. The adjutant

SS SCS HB 2593 19
general shall approve all applications that are in order, and shall cause an Operation
Desert Shield and Operation Desert Storm medallion, medal, and certificate to be
prepared for each approved veteran in the form created by the Missouri veterans'
commission under section 42.315. The medallions, medals, and certificates shall be
awarded until the supply of medallions, medals, and certificates is exhausted. The
adjutant general shall notify the general assembly when such supply totals less than one
hundred.
105.265. 1. All officers and employees of this state, or of any department or agency
thereof, all members of state retirement systems, and all other public employees of this state
who are entitled to life insurance benefits as a state employee or a member of a state
retirement system, and who are or become members of the United States Armed Forces or the
National Guard and who are called to military service under competent orders from the
appropriate military authority in time of active armed warfare shall be entitled to such life
insurance benefits for the entire duration of such military deployment, including time periods
in excess of twelve months, subject to the terms and conditions of any life insurance policy
that may be in place to provide such coverage. Such persons shall be required to pay the cost
of such coverage.
2. (1) The adjutant general shall be the official sponsor of the state-sponsored
life insurance program. The adjutant general shall:
(a) Allow, facilitate, and coordinate all efforts to make the state-sponsored life
insurance program available to all members of the Missouri National Guard;
(b) Provide an opportunity for members of the Missouri National Guard to
purchase products of the state-sponsored life insurance program;
(c) Allow, facilitate, and coordinate requested allotments with the appropriate
United States Property and Fiscal Office for purposes of the state-sponsored life
insurance program;
(d) Allow representatives of the state-sponsored life insurance program to
provide members of the Missouri National Guard with briefings during annual training
and inactive duty training periods to educate members on the state-sponsored life
insurance program and its benefits; and
(e) Allow members of the Missouri National Guard to designate or change
beneficiaries under the state-sponsored life insurance program.
(2) The Missouri National Guard Association shall select the insurer used to
provide the state-sponsored life insurance program.
(3) As used in this subsection, the term "state-sponsored life insurance
program" means the life insurance program exclusively offered to all members of the

SS SCS HB 2593 20
Missouri National Guard through the Missouri National Guard Association pursuant to
the federal Veterans' Insurance Act of 1974, Pub. L. 93-289.
105.270. 1. All officers and employees of this state, or of any department or agency
thereof, or of any county, municipality, school district, or other political subdivision, and all
other public employees of this state who are or may become members of the National Guard
or of any reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States, shall be entitled to
leave of absence from their respective duties, without loss of time, pay, regular leave,
impairment of efficiency rating, or of any other rights or benefits, to which otherwise entitled,
for all periods of military services during which they are engaged in the performance of duty
or training in the service of this state at the call of the governor and as ordered by the adjutant
general without regard to length of time, and for all periods of military services during which
they are engaged in the performance of duty in the service of the United States under
competent orders for a period not to exceed a total of one hundred [twenty] sixtyhours in any
federal fiscal year.
2. Before any payment of salary is made covering the period of the leave the officer
or the employee shall file with the appointing authority or supervising agency an official
order from the appropriate military authority as evidence of such duty for which military
leave pay is granted which order shall contain the certification of the officer or employee's
commanding officer of performance of duty in accordance with the terms of such order.
3. No member of the organized militia shall be discharged from employment by any
of the aforementioned agencies because of being a member of the organized militia, nor shall
he be hindered or prevented from performing any militia service he may be called upon to
perform by proper authority nor otherwise be discriminated against or dissuaded from
enlisting or continuing his service in the militia by threat or injury to him in respect to his
employment. Any officer or agent of the aforementioned agencies violating any of the
provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other administrative rule or law to the
contrary, any person entitled to military leave pursuant to the provisions of subsection 1 of
this section shall only be charged military leave for any hours which that person would
otherwise have been required to work had it not been for such military leave. The minimum
charge for military leave shall be one hour and additional charges for military leave shall be in
multiples of the minimum charge.
173.239. 1. Any member of the Missouri National Guard who possesses the
qualifications set forth in this section may, while he or she is a member of the Missouri
National Guard, be awarded educational assistance in the form of:
(1) A tuition and fee waiver for undergraduate courses at a postsecondary institution
of higher education located in this state that directly receives funds appropriated by the

SS SCS HB 2593 21
general assembly. This tuition and fee waiver shall not be implemented prior to the 2025-26
academic year. The tuition and fee waiver shall be only for tuition and fees that remain after
the application of all payments from a tuition assistance program of the National Guard,
Army, or Air Force; additional federal military tuition assistance; [GI Bill educational
entitlements;] awarded external scholarships; and federal financial grants, including the Pell
grant, that are available to the member in the current semester. For purposes of this section,
the term "fee" or "fees" mean any mandatory fees charged by an institution to all full-time
students as a condition of enrollment; or
(2) A grant to an eligible institution of his or her choice. For purposes of this
subdivision, the term "eligible institution" shall mean:
(a) An approved public institution or an approved private institution, as those terms
are defined in section 173.1102; or
(b) Any institution of postsecondary education that is required by law to be, and
currently is, certified to operate by the coordinating board for higher education; that is
institutionally accredited by an accrediting commission recognized by the United States
Department of Education; that has operated continuously in this state for five or more years;
that has no more than fifty percent of its students in correspondence programs; and that offers
a one-year or two-year certificate, associate or baccalaureate degree programs, or graduate or
professional degree programs.
2. (1) Educational assistance provided under this section shall not exceed the lesser
of the following:
(a) The actual tuition, as defined in section 173.260, charged at an approved
institution where the member is enrolled or accepted for enrollment; or
(b) The product of the number of credit hours taken multiplied by the average tuition
cost per credit hour charged to a Missouri resident at the University of Missouri for
attendance, with such average cost determined by the Missouri National Guard.
(2) The grants provided under this section may be prorated subject to appropriations
in an amount no less than fifty percent of the limits set forth in this subsection.
3. (1) For either type of educational assistance described in this section, a member of
the Missouri National Guard may apply to the appropriate office of the Missouri National
Guard before each semester. The member shall:
(a) Provide a certificate of satisfactory service of his or her Missouri National Guard
duties from his or her commanding officer;
(b) Possess all other necessary entrance requirements of the school of his or her
choice;

SS SCS HB 2593 22
(c) Provide proof of maintaining a cumulative grade point average (GPA) of at least
two point five on a four-point scale, or the equivalent on another scale approved by the
program administrator, while attending the approved public or private institution;
(d) Have not yet earned a bachelor's degree; and
(e) Have completed and submitted a FAFSA for the academic term for which
educational assistance is requested.
(2) For the tuition and fee waiver, the waiver shall be awarded if the member applies
and is otherwise eligible pursuant to this section, but the waiver shall be awarded only after
the Missouri National Guard has distributed any moneys available for the member through
the state tuition assistance program. For each semester, the tuition and fee waiver
awarded by an institution to a member shall not exceed the amount of the grant received
by the institution for that member pursuant to this section.
4. If the grade point average of a member who is receiving educational assistance
pursuant to this section falls below two point five on a four-point scale, or the equivalent on
another scale, such member shall retain the educational assistance and shall be placed on
probation under the educational assistance program. Failure to achieve a current grade point
average of at least two point five on a four-point scale or the equivalent on another scale for
future semesters or equivalent academic terms shall result in termination of the educational
assistance effective as of the next academic term. The member shall be removed from
probation status upon achieving a cumulative grade point average of two point five on a four-
point scale or the equivalent on another scale.
5. For the tuition and fee waiver, an applicant shall cease to be eligible if the total
number of credit hours completed by the applicant exceeds one hundred twenty. Credit hours
earned with the educational assistance described in this section and credit hours earned
without the educational assistance described in this section shall be counted to determine the
total number of credit hours completed by an applicant for purposes of this subsection.
6. The tuition and fee waiver shall not be available in any fiscal year in which the
percent of total program costs covered by the state appropriation for the educational
assistance provided pursuant to this section has decreased compared to the previous fiscal
year.
7. If a recipient of either type of educational assistance pursuant to this section ceases
to maintain their active military affiliation while enrolled in an academic semester or term for
any reason except death, disability, or medical disqualification the educational assistance shall
be terminated and the recipient shall repay any amounts awarded or waived for the academic
semester or term.
8. The educational assistance program established pursuant to this section shall be
administered by the office of the adjutant general of the Missouri National Guard. The

SS SCS HB 2593 23
Missouri National Guard shall establish guidelines for equitable administrative distribution of
educational assistance.
[41.220. 1. There shall be a military council consisting of the adjutant
general as president of the council, general officers, the commanding officers
of all brigades, wings, or groups, and any other officer or officers the adjutant
general may deem desirable or necessary, and an officer appointed by the
adjutant general from his office to act as recorder without vote. The senior
United States Army and United States Air Force advisors on duty with the
organized state militia, the comptroller of the state military forces and the
United States Property and Fiscal Officer shall be ex officio members without
vote. The adjutant general shall appoint the members of the military council
on general orders annually. These orders will be amended as necessary.
Members of the military council shall receive actual and necessary expenses
for attending meetings thereof.
2. It shall be the duty of this council to act in an advisory capacity to
the commander in chief on all matters placed before it by the governor, the
adjutant general or any member of the council and to submit recommendations
thereon to the governor, which shall become effective only upon his approval.
The military council shall determine and authorize the number of regular and
temporary employees necessary to the administration and supply of the
military forces and fix the pay and allowances of the employees within the
limitations of appropriations. It shall be the further duty of the council to
make recommendations on the needs of the militia for legislative
appropriations, and no request for appropriations of public money for the
support of the militia, other than a request by the governor or by a member of
the general assembly, shall be made without the recommendation of the
council being noted thereon for the information of the governor and the
legislature. All appropriations made for military purposes shall be apportioned
and expended by the council. Vouchers and accounts covering the expenditure
of funds and appropriations for the support of the militia shall be approved and
paid only when fully itemized, certified and approved by the president of the
council.
3. The council shall meet quarterly at the City of Jefferson at such time
as the president shall designate. Special meetings may be called by the
governor or the president of the council at any time or place designated. A
majority of the members of the council on duty within the state shall constitute
a quorum for the transaction of its business. The council shall keep full and
detailed records of its proceedings. The president of the council in an unusual
emergency is authorized to poll the members of the military council and
require them to cast their vote through whatever means of communications are
available to them and the action taken in that manner shall have the same force
and effect as a quarterly or special meeting when the poll will expedite
recommendations on and furnish advice in the conduct of the affairs of the
militia of this state to a better state of preparedness.]
✔